Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 4. Conversion.

§79-37-401.
Conversion authorized.

A charitable organization as defined in Section 79-11-501 may not convert under this Article 4.

By complying with this article, a domestic entity may become:

A domestic entity that is a different type of entity; or

A foreign entity that is a different type of entity, if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation and the domestic entity has complied with Article 5 of this chapter.

By complying with the provisions of this article applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may become a domestic entity that is a different type of entity if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation and the foreign entity has first domesticated to this state under Article 5 of this chapter.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic entity but does not refer to a conversion, the provision applies to a conversion of the entity as if the conversion were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2015.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 20; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment added (a) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; added “and the domestic entity has complied with Article 5 of this chapter” at the end of (b)(2); and added “and the foreign entity has first domesticated to this state under Article 5 of this chapter.”

§79-37-402.
Plan of conversion.

A domestic entity may convert to a different type of entity under this article by approving a plan of conversion. The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name and type of entity of the converting entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

The manner of converting the interests in the converting entity into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

The proposed public organic record of the converted entity if it will be a filing entity;

The full text of the private organic rules of the converted entity which are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the conversion; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the organic rules of the converting entity.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a plan of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 21, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-403.
Approval of conversion.

A plan of conversion is not effective unless it has been approved:

By a domestic converting entity:

In a record, by each interest holder of a domestic converting entity which will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the conversion becomes effective, unless, in the case of an entity that is not a business or nonprofit corporation:

In accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic rules for approval of a conversion;

If its organic rules do not provide for approval of a conversion, in accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic law and organic rules for approval of:

In the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, a merger, as if the conversion were a merger;

In the case of a business corporation, a merger requiring approval by a vote of the interest holders of the business corporation, as if the conversion were that type of merger; or

By all of the interest holders of the entity entitled to vote on or consent to any matter if in the case of any entity that is not a business corporation, neither its organic law nor organic rules provide for approval of a conversion or a merger; and

The organic rules of the entity provide in a record for the approval of a conversion or a merger in which some or all of its interest holders become subject to interest holder liability by the vote or consent of fewer than all the interest holders; and

The interest holder voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the organic rules or became an interest holder after the adoption of that provision.

A conversion of a foreign converting entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 22, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-404.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of conversion.

A plan of conversion of a domestic converting entity may be amended:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its governors or interest holders in the manner provided in the plan, but an interest holder that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the conversion is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

A statement that the conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the interest holders of the converting entity under the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the converted entity which will be in effect immediately after the conversion becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the converted entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the interest holder in any material respect.

After a plan of conversion has been approved and before a statement of conversion becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic converting entity may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of conversion is abandoned after a statement of conversion has been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the converting entity, must be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing before the statement of conversion becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the conversion is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the converting entity;

The date on which the statement of conversion was filed by the Secretary of State; and

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 23, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-405.
Statement of conversion; effective date.

A statement of conversion must be signed on behalf of the converting entity and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

A statement of conversion must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converting entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

If the statement of conversion is not to be effective upon filing, the later date and time on which it will become effective, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing;

If the converting entity is a domestic entity, a statement that the plan of conversion was approved in accordance with this article or, if the converting entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the conversion was approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation; copies of the conversion documents from its jurisdiction of formation must be filed;

If the converted entity is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment;

If the converted entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification, as an attachment; and

If the converted entity is a foreign entity, a mailing address to which the Secretary of State may send any process served on the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 79-37-406(e).

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b), a statement of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the converted entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed and may omit any provision that is not required to be included in a restatement of the public organic record.

A statement of conversion is effective on the date and time of filing or the later date and time specified in the statement of conversion.

If the converted entity is a domestic entity, the conversion is effective when the statement of conversion is effective. If the converted entity is a foreign entity, the conversion is effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the converted entity; or

When the statement is effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 24; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment added “copies of the conversion documents from its jurisdiction of formation must be filed” at the end of (b)(4); and deleted former (e), which read: “A plan of conversion that is signed by a domestic converting entity and meets all the requirements of subsection (b) may be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing instead of a statement of conversion and on filing has the same effect. If a plan of conversion is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this chapter to a statement of conversion refer to the plan of conversion filed under this subsection” and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

§79-37-406.
Effect of conversion.

When a conversion becomes effective:

The converted entity is:

All property of the converting entity continues to be vested in the converted entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converting entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converted entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of conversion, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting entity remain in the converted entity;

The name of the converted entity may be substituted for the name of the converting entity in any pending action or proceeding;

If a converted entity is a filing entity, its public organic record is effective;

If the converted entity is a limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification is effective;

The private organic rules of the converted entity which are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of conversion are effective; and

The interests in the converting entity are converted, and the interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of conversion and to any appraisal rights they have under Section 79-37-109 and the converting entity’s organic law.

Organized under and subject to the organic law of the converted entity; and

The same entity without interruption as the converting entity;

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of the converting entity, the conversion does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the converting entity.

When a conversion becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the converting entity and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of a conversion has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the conversion becomes effective.

When a conversion becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic converting entity with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The conversion does not discharge any interest holder liability under the organic law of a domestic converting entity to the extent the interest holder liability arose before the conversion became effective.

The person does not have interest holder liability under the organic law of the domestic converting entity for any debt, obligation, or other liability that arises after the conversion becomes effective.

The organic law of the domestic converting entity continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under paragraph (1) as if the conversion had not occurred.

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by other law or the organic rules of the domestic converting entity with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under paragraph (1) as if the conversion had not occurred.

When a conversion becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the converted entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities in accordance with applicable law.

If the converting entity is a registered foreign entity, its registration to do business in this state is amended to reflect its new status when the conversion becomes effective.

A conversion does not require the entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 25; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment substituted “is amended to reflect its new status when” for “is canceled when” in (f).